test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-nâtam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - nâtam

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: ninâtîn
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kinâtîn
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: nâtam

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-nâtamân
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: î-nâtaman
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-nâtahk

      # Imp
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nâta
      

      # Prs # Ind
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: ninâtîn
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kinâtîn
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: nâtam
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: ninâtînân
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kinâtînaw, kinâtînânaw]
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kinâtînâwâw
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: nâtamwak
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: nâtamithiwa
      nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X: nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-nâtamân
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: î-nâtaman
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-nâtahk
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-nâtamâhk
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-nâtamahk
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-nâtamîk
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: î-nâtahkik
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-nâtamithit
      PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X: PV/e+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-nâtîn
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-nâtîn
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kî-nâtam
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-nâtînân
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kikî-nâtînaw, kikî-nâtînânaw]
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-nâtînâwâw
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: kî-nâtamwak
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-nâtamithiwa
      PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X: PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-nâtamân
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: î-kî-nâtaman
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-nâtahk
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-nâtamâhk
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-nâtamahk
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-nâtamîk
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-nâtahkik
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-nâtamithit
      PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X: PV/e+PV/ki+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-nâtîn
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-nâtîn
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: wî-nâtam
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-nâtînân
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kiwî-nâtînaw, kiwî-nâtînânaw]
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-nâtînâwâw
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: wî-nâtamwak
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-nâtamithiwa
      PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X: PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-nâtamân
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: î-wî-nâtaman
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-nâtahk
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-nâtamâhk
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-nâtamahk
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-nâtamîk
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-nâtahkik
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-nâtamithit
      PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X: PV/e+PV/wi+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Sg: nika-nâtîn
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Sg: kika-nâtîn
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: ka-nâtam
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+1Pl: nika-nâtînân
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+12Pl: [kika-nâtînaw, kika-nâtînânaw]
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+2Pl: kika-nâtînâwâw
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+3Pl: ka-nâtamwak
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-nâtamithiwa
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X: PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Ind+X
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-nâtamân
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: ka-nâtaman
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-nâtahk
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-nâtamâhk
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-nâtamahk
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-nâtamîk
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: ka-nâtahkik
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-nâtamithit
      PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X: PV/ka+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-nâtamân
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg: ta-nâtaman
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-nâtahk
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-nâtamâhk
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-nâtamahk
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-nâtamîk
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl: ta-nâtahkik
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-nâtamithit
      PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X: PV/ta+nâtam+V+TI+Cnj+X
      

      # Fut # Cond
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nâtamâni
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: nâtamani
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nâtahki
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nâtamâhki
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [nâtamahki, nâtamahko]
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nâtamîko
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nâtahkwâwi
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nâtamithici
      nâtam+V+TI+Fut+Cond+X: nâtamihki
      

      # Imp # Imm
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nâta
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nâtîtân
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nâtamok
      

      # Imp # Del
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nâtamôhkan
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: nâtamôhkahk
      nâtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nâtamôhkîk
      
